Vermont, session 2025-2026, S101.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 567 is amended to read:
§ 567. MOTOR VEHICLE POLLUTION
(a) The Secretary, in conjunction with the Department of Motor Vehicles,
may provide rules for the control of emissions from motor vehicles. However,
the Secretary shall not adopt the California rules for new motor vehicles
authorized in the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7507. Such The rules may
prescribe requirements for the installation and use of equipment designed to
VT LEG #380502 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.101
2025 Page 2 of 3
reduce or eliminate emissions and for the proper maintenance of the equipment
and the vehicles. Rules pursuant to this section shall be consistent with
provisions of federal law, if any, relating to control of emissions from the
vehicles concerned and shall not require, as a condition precedent to the initial
sale of a vehicle or vehicular equipment, the inspection, certification, or other
approval of any feature or equipment designed for the control of emissions
from motor vehicles, if the feature or equipment has been certified, approved,
or otherwise authorized pursuant to federal law.
* * *
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 558 is amended to read:
§ 558. EMISSION CONTROL REQUIREMENTS
The Secretary may establish such emission control requirements, by rule, as
in his or her the Secretary’s judgment may be necessary to prevent, abate, or
control air pollution. The requirements may be for the State as a whole or may
vary from area to area, as may be appropriate to facilitate accomplishment of
the purposes of this chapter, and in order to take necessary or desirable account
of varying local conditions. However, the Secretary shall not adopt the
California rules for new motor vehicles authorized in the Clean Air Act,
42 U.S.C. § 7507.
VT LEG #380502 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.101
2025 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 592 is amended to read:
§ 592. THE VERMONT CLIMATE ACTION PLAN
* * *
(e) The Plan shall form the basis for the rules adopted by the Secretary of
Natural Resources pursuant to section 593 of this chapter. If the Council fails
to adopt the Plan or update the Plan as required by this chapter, the Secretary
shall proceed with adopting and implementing rules pursuant to subsection
593(j) of this chapter to achieve the greenhouse gas emissions reductions
requirements pursuant to section 578 of this title. However, in neither instance
shall the Secretary adopt the California rules for new motor vehicles authorized
in the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7507.
Sec. 4. RULE REPEAL
The Vermont Low Emission Vehicle and Zero Emission Vehicle Rules,
Department of Environmental Conservation, Chapter 40: Vermont Low
Emission Vehicle and Zero Emission Vehicle Rules (CVR 12-30-40) are
repealed.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380502 v.1